Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1211.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2359XC (3) 91 jm/md S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 257.31, subsection 5, paragraph o, Code 1 2025, is amended by striking the paragraph and inserting in 2 lieu thereof the following: 3 o. (1) The percentage of students enrolled in the school 4 district as the result of open enrollment under section 282.18 5 is equal to or greater than thirty-five percent of the total 6 number of students enrolled in the school district. The 7 committee shall not approve supplemental aid or a modified 8 supplemental amount that exceeds an amount equal to fifty 9 percent of the product of the net increase in the school 10 districtâs enrollment due to open enrollment multiplied by the 11 sum of the following amounts: 12 (a) The difference between the districtâs regular program 13 district cost per pupil minus the regular program state cost 14 per pupil. 15 (b) The teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil. 16 (c) The professional development supplement district cost 17 per pupil. 18 (d) The early intervention supplement district cost per 19 pupil. 20 (2) Prior to filing a request for supplemental aid or a 21 modified supplemental amount based on the grounds specified 22 in this paragraph, the board of directors shall hold a public 23 hearing on the issue and shall publish the notice of the time 24 and place of the public hearing. Notice of the time and place 25 of the public hearing shall be published not less than ten nor 26 more than twenty days before the public hearing in a newspaper 27 that is a newspaper of general circulation in the school 28 district. 29 (3) A school district is not eligible for supplemental aid 30 or a modified supplemental amount under this paragraph if a 31 majority of the students enrolled in the school district as 32 the result of open enrollment are students receiving online 33 instruction from a private provider under section 256.43, 34 subsection 2. 35 -1- LSB 2359XC (3) 91 jm/md 1/ 3 S.F. _____ Sec. 2. REPEAL. 2024 Iowa Acts, chapter 1152, section 45, 1 is repealed. 2 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 3 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 4 Sec. 4. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies July 1, 2025, for 5 school budget years beginning on or after that date. 6